Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1411
Funeral establishment, defined.

Funeral establishment means a place of business situated at a specific street address or location devoted to the care and preparation of dead human bodies for burial, disposition, or cremation or to conducting or arranging funeral services for dead human bodies.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 547.